Wyoming statutes. Title 37 Public Utilities
Article 2. Certificates and Permits

§ 37-8-201.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as §

31-18-209

by Laws 1993, ch. 68, § 4.

Cross references. —

For present provisions concerning issuance of certificates and deposit of insurance, see §

31-18-209

.

§ 37-8-202.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as §

31-18-210

by Laws 1993, ch. 68, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

Section

31-18-210

was repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 46, § 2.

§§ 37-8-203 and 37-8-204.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as §§ 31-18-211 and 31-18-212 by Laws 1993, ch. 68, § 4.

Editor's notes. —

Sections 31-18-211 and 31-18-212 were repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 46, § 2.

§ 37-8-205.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1989, ch. 129, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1983, ch. 140, § 1, related to use of additional equipment, and to plate transfer and lost plate permits.

§ 37-8-206.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as § 31-18-213 by Laws 1993, ch. 68, § 4.

Editor's notes. —

Section 31-18-213 was repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 46, § 2.